apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
    <pardef n="call/ar__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aríem</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aria</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aríeu</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aries</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>arien</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aria</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>arem</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aré</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>areu</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aràs</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aran</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>arà</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>éssim</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>és</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>éssiu</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>essis</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>essin</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>és</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ant</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ant</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__callant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>àrem</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>í</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>àreu</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ares</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>aren</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>à</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>em</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>am</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>em</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__callant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>am</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__callant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eu</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>au</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eu</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__callant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>au</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__callant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__calla"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>in</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>en</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>in</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__callant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>en</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__callant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__calla"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__calla"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ar</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ar</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__callant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>àvem</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ava</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>àveu</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aves</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aven</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ava</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>éssim</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>àrem</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>és</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ara</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>éssiu</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>àreu</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>essis</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

<e lm="callar"><i>call</i><par n="call/ar__vblex"/></e>
